Oklahoma, session 2025, SB62.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-129.11, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3-129.11. A. There is hereby established the School


District Empowerment Program which shall be administered by the


State Board of Education. The purpose of the program is to empower


locally elected school district board of education members to govern


school districts and make decisions based on the needs of their


students and circumstances.



Req. No. 570 Page 1


B. 1. Subject to the provisions of this section, a school


district shall be allowed to submit a request to the State Board of


Education for an exemption from all statutory requirements and State


Board of Education rules from which charter schools are exempt, as


provided for in the Oklahoma Charter Schools Act. Any request for


exemption shall include a plan which outlines the goals sought to be


achieved at a minimum, include the educational and fiscal benefits,


and the anticipated impacts or outcomes the plan will have in the


district.


2. Within ninety (90) days after receiving the request and


plan, the State Board of Education shall approve or disapprove the


request. If the State Board does not approve the request, it shall


provide to the school district a written explanation of the basis


for its decision. The school district may resubmit an amended


request at any time after the denial. The request shall be approved


by the State Board before implementation by the school district. An


approved request and plan shall be for no longer than three (3)


years. Prior to the beginning of the third year, the school


district may apply for renewal of the approved request and plan.


The school district shall be required to submit an annual report and


the State Board shall annually assess the academic achievement and


fiscal status of the school district.


C. Nothing in this section shall prevent a school district


board of education from choosing to follow any or all state laws,

Req. No. 570 Page 2


rules, or regulations from which a charter school is exempt. A


school district which has been granted approval by the State Board


for exemption as set forth in subsection B of this section shall


have the option to adopt policies to implement any requirement for


the school district that is consistent with any statutory


requirement or, mandate, or State Board administrative rule, but a


participating school shall comply with the following requirements:


1. Students who reside in the school district shall be entitled


to attend school in the district as set forth in Section 1-114 of


this title;


2. School districts shall comply with the requirements of the


minimum salary schedule for teachers as set forth in Section 18-


114.12 18-114.15 of this title;


3. Employees of school districts shall continue to participate


as members of the Teachers’ Retirement System of Oklahoma as set


forth in Section 17-101 et seq. of this title;


4. School districts shall comply with the requirement to


provide a health insurance plan for school district employees as set


forth in Section 5-117.5 of this title and to establish or make


available to school district employees a cafeteria plan as set forth


in Section 26-104 of this title;


5. School districts shall require any person employed by the


school district to file with the district board of education a


current Oklahoma criminal history record check from the Oklahoma

Req. No. 570 Page 3


State Bureau of Investigation as well as a national criminal history


record check as defined in Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma


Statutes. Each district shall adopt a policy regarding criminal


history record checks as set forth in Section 5-142 of this title;


6. School districts shall comply with the requirement to


evaluate teachers and to train personnel designated to conduct


personnel evaluations as set forth in Sections 6-101.10 and 6-101.11


of this title, the dismissal and due process procedures for


administrators as set forth in Sections 6-101.13 through 6-101.15 of


this title and the due process procedures for teachers as set forth


in Sections 6-101.21 through 6-101.26 of this title;


7. School districts shall comply with the requirement to make


payroll deductions for either or both professional organization dues


and political contributions upon the request of an employee as set


forth in Section 5-139 of this title;


8. School districts shall comply with the dismissal and due


process procedures for education support employees as set forth in


Sections 6-101.40 through 6-101.47 of this title;


9. 8. School districts shall employ as teachers, counselors,


librarians, school nurses, superintendents, principals, supervisors,


or any other instructional, supervisory, or administrative employee


only those persons who are certified by the State Board of Education


in accordance with the Oklahoma Teacher Preparation Act, except for



Req. No. 570 Page 4


persons exempt from the certification requirements as otherwise


provided by law;


10. 9. School districts shall provide for negotiations between


school employees and school districts as set forth in Sections 509.1


through 509.11 of this title;


11. 10. School districts shall be required to offer and


students enrolled in the school district shall be required to


complete the curriculum requirements as set forth in Section 11-


103.6 of this title;


12. Students enrolled in the school district shall be required


to demonstrate mastery of the state academic content standards as


set forth in Section 1210.523 of this title; and


13. 11. Members of the school district board of education shall


be required to satisfy the instruction and continuing education


requirements as set forth in Sections 5-110, 5-110.1, and 5-110.2 of


this title.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 5-139, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 5-139. School districts shall make be prohibited from


making payroll deductions for either or both professional


organization dues and political contributions at the written request


of any school employee and shall transmit deducted funds to the


organization designated by the school district employee. Such


deductions shall be on a ten-month basis unless otherwise designated

Req. No. 570 Page 5


by the employee organization. However, a school employee may


request at any time in writing, including by email or fax, for the


school district to immediately terminate or initiate payroll


deductions to a professional organization. Upon receipt of any


written request, the school district shall within five (5) business


days or by the next pay period, whichever is earlier, terminate or


initiate any future payroll deductions of the requesting school


employee to a professional organization. Upon receipt of a written


request, the school district shall notify the professional


organization of the initiation or termination of payroll deductions


within fifteen (15) business days. If the request is to terminate a


deduction, the school district shall not make any advance payments


to any professional organization of any future dues on behalf of the


school employee. No school district policy or negotiated agreement


shall place any other conditions or requirements, including but not


limited to personal hand delivery, upon any employee to initiate or


terminate any payroll deduction to a professional organization


except for a written request as outlined in this section. Any


school district policy or provision in a negotiated agreement that


places additional conditions or requirements on initiation or


termination beyond those outlined in this section shall be null and


void. A school district which fails to terminate payroll deductions


for an employee in accordance with this section shall immediately


reimburse the employee the amount of all payroll deductions made by

Req. No. 570 Page 6


the school district after the employee’s request, and the amount due


the employee shall double every thirty (30) days until paid in full.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-570 EB 1/19/2025 5:40:10 AM































Req. No. 570 Page 7